Rhode Island, session 2025, SB582.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 38-2-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 38-2 entitled "Access to Public
Records" is hereby amended to read as follows:
38-2-4. Cost.
(a) Subject to the provisions of § 38-2-3, a public body must allow copies to be made or
provide copies of public records. The cost per copied page of written documents provided to the
public shall not exceed fifteen cents ($.15) per page for documents copyable on common business
or legal size paper. A public body may not charge more than the reasonable actual cost for providing
electronic records or retrieving records from storage where the public body is assessed a retrieval
fee.
(b) A reasonable charge may be made for the search or retrieval of documents. Hourly costs
for a search and retrieval shall not exceed fifteen dollars ($15.00) per hour and no costs shall be
charged for the first hour of a search or retrieval. For the purposes of this subsection, multiple
requests from any person or entity to the same public body within a thirty (30) day time period shall
be considered one request.
(c) Copies of documents shall be provided and the search and retrieval of documents
accomplished within a reasonable time after a request. A public body upon request, shall provide
an estimate of the costs of a request for documents prior to providing copies.
(d) Upon request, the public body shall provide a detailed itemization of the costs charged
for search and retrieval.

(e) A court may reduce or waive the fees for costs charged for search or retrieval if it
determines that the information requested is in the public interest because it is likely to contribute
significantly to public understanding of the operations or activities of the government and is not
primarily in the commercial interest of the requester.
(f) The fees for costs charged for search, retrieval or copying shall be waived for members
of the general assembly who certify that they are acting in their official capacity and require the
copies for the discharge of their legislative duties.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001972
========
LC001972 - Page 2 of 3